South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 13, Title 24 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 24-13-185 (A) Notwithstanding another provision of law, a jail, detention facility, correctional facility, or prison shall not: (1) prohibit, eliminate, or unreasonably limit in-person visitation of inmates; or (2) coerce, compel, or pressure an inmate to forego or limit in person visitation. (B) A jail, detention facility, correctional facility, or prison may use video or other types of electronic devices for inmate communication with visitors. However, communication by way of these types of devices is in addition to and shall not replace in person visitation. (C) Nothing contained in this section prohibits the temporary suspension of visitation privileges for good cause including, but not limited to, misbehavior or during an emergency. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----